California statutes. Civil Code
(a) Notwithstanding subdivision (c) of Section 1993.02, if the landlord releases to the former tenant property that remains on the premises after a tenancy is terminated, the landlord shall not be liable with respect to that property to any person.

(b) If the landlord releases property pursuant to Section 1987 to a person, other than the former tenant, who is reasonably believed by the landlord
to be the owner of the property, the landlord shall not be liable with respect to that property to any of the following persons:

(1) A person to whom notice was given pursuant to Section 1993.03.

(2) A person to whom notice was not given pursuant to Section 1993.03, unless the person proves that, prior to releasing the property, the landlord believed or reasonably should have believed that the person had an interest in the property and also that the landlord knew or should have known upon reasonable investigation the address of the person.

(c) If property is disposed of pursuant to Section 1993.07, the landlord shall not be liable with respect to that property to any of the following persons:

(1) A person to whom notice was given pursuant to Section
1993.03.

(2) A person to whom notice was not given pursuant to Section 1993.03, unless the person proves that, prior to disposing of the property pursuant to Section 1993.07, the landlord believed or reasonably should have believed that the person had an interest in the property and also that the landlord knew or should have known upon reasonable investigation the address of the person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 140, Sec. 35.   (AB 1164)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

1993.09.

If a notice of belief of abandonment is given to a lessee pursuant to Section 1951.3, the notice to the former tenant given pursuant to Section 1993.03 may be given at the same time as the notice of belief of abandonment, even though the tenancy is not terminated until the end of the period specified in the notice of belief of abandonment. The notices may be combined in one notice that contains all the information required by the sections under which the notices are
given.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 140, Sec. 36.   (AB 1164)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Assignment and Sublease [1995.010. - 1995.340.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [1995.010. - 1995.030.]

1995.010.

This chapter applies to transfer of a tenant’s interest in a lease of real property for other than residential purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 982, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1995.020.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “Landlord” includes a tenant who is a sublandlord under a sublease.

(b) “Lease” means a lease or sublease of real property for other than residential purposes, and includes modifications and other agreements affecting a lease.

(c) “Restriction on transfer” means a provision in a lease that restricts the right of transfer of the tenant’s interest in the lease.

(d) “Tenant” includes a subtenant or assignee.

(e) “Transfer” of a tenant’s interest in a lease means an assignment, sublease, or other voluntary or involuntary transfer or encumbrance of all or part of a tenant’s interest in the lease.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 982, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1995.030.

Except as provided in Section 1995.270, this chapter applies to a lease executed before, on, or after January 1, 1990.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 982, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Restrictions on Transfer [1995.210. - 1995.270.]

1995.210.

(a) Subject to the limitations in this chapter, a lease may include a restriction on transfer of the tenant’s interest in the lease.

(b) Unless a lease includes a restriction on transfer, a tenant’s rights under the lease include unrestricted transfer of the tenant’s interest in the lease.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 982, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1995.220.

An ambiguity in a restriction on transfer of a tenant’s interest in a lease shall be construed in favor of transferability.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 982, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1995.230.

A restriction on transfer of a tenant’s interest in a lease may absolutely prohibit transfer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 982, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1995.240.

A restriction on transfer of a tenant’s interest in a lease may provide that the transfer is subject to any express standard or condition, including, but not limited to, a provision that the landlord is entitled to some or all of any consideration the tenant receives from a transferee in excess of the rent under the lease.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 982, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1995.250.

A restriction on transfer of a tenant’s interest in a lease may require the landlord’s consent for transfer subject to any express standard or condition for giving or withholding consent, including, but not limited to, either of the following:

(a) The landlord’s consent may not be unreasonably withheld.

(b) The landlord’s consent may be withheld subject to express standards or conditions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 982, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1995.260.

If a restriction on transfer of the tenant’s interest in a lease requires the landlord’s consent for transfer but provides no standard for giving or withholding consent, the restriction on transfer shall be construed to include an implied standard that the landlord’s consent may not be unreasonably withheld. Whether the landlord’s consent has been unreasonably withheld in a particular case is a question of fact on which the tenant has the burden of proof. The tenant may satisfy the burden of proof by showing that, in response to the tenant’s written request for a statement of reasons for withholding
 consent, the landlord has failed, within a reasonable time, to state in writing a reasonable objection to the transfer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 982, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1995.270.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares:

(1) It is the public policy of the state and fundamental to the commerce and economic development of the state to enable and facilitate freedom of contract by the parties to commercial real property leases.

(2) The parties to commercial real property leases must be able to negotiate and conduct their affairs in reasonable reliance on the rights and protections given them under the laws of the state.

(3) Until the case of Kendall v. Ernest Pestana, Inc., 40 Cal. 3d 488 (1985), and its predecessor, Cohen v. Ratinoff, 147 Cal. App. 3d 321 (1983), the parties to commercial real property leases could reasonably rely on the law of the state to provide that if a lease restriction requires the landlord’s consent for transfer of the tenant’s interest in the lease but provides no standard for giving or withholding consent, the landlord’s consent may be unreasonably withheld.

(4) The Kendall and Cohen decisions reversed the law on which parties to commercial real property leases executed before September 23, 1983, the date of the Cohen decision, could reasonably rely, thereby frustrating the expectations of the parties, with the result of impairing commerce and economic development.

(b) Section 1995.260 applies to a
 restriction on transfer executed on or after September 23, 1983. If a restriction on transfer executed before September 23, 1983, requires the landlord’s consent for the tenant’s transfer but provides no standard for giving or withholding consent, the landlord’s consent may be unreasonably withheld. For purposes of this subdivision, if the terms of a restriction on transfer are fixed by an option or other agreement, the restriction on transfer is deemed to be executed on the date of execution of the option or other agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 982, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Breach and Remedies [1995.300. - 1995.340.]

1995.300.

A remedy provided by law for violation of the rights of the tenant or of the landlord concerning transfer of a tenant’s interest in a lease, including a remedy provided in this article, is (a) subject to an express provision in the lease that affects the remedy and (b) subject to any applicable defense, whether legal or equitable, including, but not limited to, waiver and estoppel.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 67, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1995.310.

If a restriction on transfer of a tenant’s interest in a lease requires the landlord’s consent for transfer subject to an express or implied standard that the landlord’s consent may not be unreasonably withheld, and the landlord unreasonably withholds consent to a transfer in violation of the tenant’s rights under the lease, in addition to any other remedies provided by law for breach of a lease, the tenant has all the remedies provided for breach of contract, including, but not limited to, either or both of the following:

(a) The right to
 contract damages caused by the landlord’s breach. 

(b) The right to terminate the lease.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 67, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1995.320.

If a tenant transfers the tenant’s interest in a lease in violation of a restriction on transfer of the tenant’s interest in the lease, in addition to any other remedies provided by law for breach of a lease, the landlord has all the remedies provided for breach of contract, including, but not limited to, either or both of the following:

(a) The right to contract damages caused by the tenant’s breach. 

(b) The right to terminate the lease.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 67, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1995.330.

(a) An assignee who receives or makes a transfer in violation of a restriction on transfer of a tenant’s interest in a lease is jointly and severally liable with the tenant for contract damages under Section 1995.320. For this purpose, the provisions of Section 1951.2 applicable to a lessee apply to an assignee. 

(b) The landlord’s right to terminate a lease under Section 1995.320 includes the right to terminate a transfer without terminating the lease. If the landlord terminates a transfer without terminating the
 lease, the assignee or subtenant in possession is guilty of unlawful detainer and the landlord may obtain possession from the assignee or subtenant without terminating the right to possession of the tenant. For this purpose, the landlord may use the procedure provided in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 1159) of Title 3 of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure, with the changes necessary to make the procedure applicable to this subdivision.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 67, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1995.340.

(a) Subject to subdivision (b), a restriction on transfer of a tenant’s interest in a lease applies to a subsequent transfer by a tenant, an assignee, or a subtenant notwithstanding the landlord’s consent to a prior transfer or the landlord’s waiver of a standard or condition for a prior transfer. 

(b) Subdivision (a) does not apply if either of the following conditions is satisfied: 

(1) The lease provides expressly that the restriction on transfer is
 limited to the original tenant. 

(2) The landlord states expressly in writing that the consent or waiver applies to a subsequent transfer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 67, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Use Restrictions [1997.010. - 1997.270.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [1997.010. - 1997.050.]

1997.010.

This chapter applies to a restriction on use of leased property by a tenant under a lease of real property for other than residential purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 67, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

1997.020.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “Landlord” includes a tenant who is a sublandlord under a sublease. 

(b) “Lease” means a lease or sublease of real property for other than residential purposes, and includes modifications and other agreements affecting a lease. 

(c) “Restriction on use” means a provision in a lease that restricts the use of leased property by a tenant, whether by limiting use to a specified purpose,
 mandating use for a specified purpose, prohibiting use for a specified purpose, limiting or prohibiting a change in use, or otherwise. 

(d) “Tenant” includes a subtenant or assignee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 67, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

1997.030.

Nothing in this chapter authorizes a restriction on use that is otherwise prohibited by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 67, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

1997.040.

(a) For the purpose of subdivision (a) of Section 1951.2 (damages on termination for breach), the amount of rental loss that could be or could have been reasonably avoided is computed by taking into account any reasonable use of the leased property. However, if the lease contains a restriction on use that is enforceable under this chapter, the computation shall take into account the restricted use of the property except to the extent the tenant proves that under all the circumstances enforcement of the restriction would be unreasonable. The circumstances include, but are not limited
 to, those involving both the leased property and any building or complex in which it is located. 

(b) The remedy described in Section 1951.4 (continuation of lease after breach and abandonment) is available notwithstanding the presence in the lease of a restriction on use of the leased property. The restriction on use applies under Section 1951.4 if it is enforceable under this chapter except to the extent the tenant proves that under all the circumstances enforcement of the restriction would be unreasonable. The circumstances include, but are not limited to, those involving both the leased property and any building or complex in which it is located.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 67, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

1997.050.

Except as provided in Section 1997.270, this chapter applies to a lease executed before, on, or after January 1, 1992.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 67, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Use Restrictions [1997.210. - 1997.270.]

1997.210.

(a) Subject to the limitations in this chapter, a lease may include a restriction on use of leased property by a tenant. 

(b) Unless the lease includes a restriction on use, a tenant’s rights under a lease include any reasonable use of leased property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 67, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

1997.220.

An ambiguity in a restriction on use of leased property by a tenant shall be construed in favor of unrestricted use.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 67, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

1997.230.

A restriction on use of leased property by a tenant may absolutely prohibit a change in use.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 67, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

1997.240.

A restriction on use of leased property by a tenant may provide that a change in use is subject to any express standard or condition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 67, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

1997.250.

A restriction on use of leased property by a tenant may require the landlord’s consent for a change in use subject to any express standard or condition for giving or withholding consent, including, but not limited to, either of the following:

(a) The landlord’s consent may not be unreasonably withheld. 

(b) The landlord’s consent may be withheld subject to express standards or conditions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 67, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

1997.260.

If a restriction on use of leased property by a tenant requires the landlord’s consent for a change in use but provides no standard for giving or withholding consent, the restriction shall be construed to include an implied standard that the landlord’s consent may not be unreasonably withheld. Whether the landlord’s consent has been unreasonably withheld in a particular case is a question of fact on which the tenant has the burden of proof. The tenant may satisfy the burden of proof by showing that, in response to the tenant’s written request for a statement of reasons for withholding consent, the
 landlord has failed, within a reasonable time, to state in writing a reasonable objection to the change in use.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 67, Sec. 3.   Applicable as prescribed by Section 1997.270.)
-------------------------------------------

1997.270.

(a) Section 1997.260 applies to a restriction on use executed on or after January 1, 1992. If a restriction on use executed before January 1, 1992, requires the landlord’s consent for a change in use of leased premises by a tenant, but provides no standard for giving or withholding consent, the landlord has sole and absolute discretion to give or withhold consent. 

(b) For purposes of this section, if the terms of a restriction on change in use are fixed by an option or other agreement, the restriction on change in use
 is deemed to be executed on the date of execution of the option or other agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 67, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------



  TITLE 6. SERVICE [2019. - 2082.]



  CHAPTER 2. Particular Employments [2019. - 2030.]



  ARTICLE 2. Agents [2019. - 2022.]

2019.

An agent must not exceed the limits of his actual authority, as defined by the Title on Agency.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2020.

An agent must use ordinary diligence to keep his principal informed of his acts in the course of the agency.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2021.

An agent employed to collect a negotiable instrument must collect it promptly, and take all measures necessary to charge the parties thereto, in case of its dishonor; and, if it is a bill of exchange, must present it for acceptance with reasonable diligence.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2022.

A mere agent of an agent is not responsible as such to the principal of the latter.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Factors [2026. - 2030.]

2026.

A factor is an agent who, in the pursuit of an independent calling, is employed by another to sell property for him, and is vested by the latter with the possession or control of the property, or authorized to receive payment therefor from the purchaser.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2027.

A factor must obey the instructions of his principal to the same extent as any other employé, notwithstanding any advances he may have made to his principal upon the property consigned to him, except that if the principal forbids him to sell at the market price, he may, nevertheless, sell for his reimbursement, after giving to his principal reasonable notice of his intention to do so, and of the time and place of sale, and proceeding in all respects as a pledgee.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2028.

A factor may sell property consigned to him on such credit as is usual; but, having once agreed with the purchaser upon the term of credit, may not extend it.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2029.

A factor who charges his principal with a guaranty commission upon a sale, thereby assumes absolutely to pay the price when it falls due, as if it were a debt of his own, and not as a mere guarantor for the purchaser; but he does not thereby assume any additional responsibility for the safety of his remittance of the proceeds.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2030.

A factor who receives property for sale, under a general agreement or usage to guarantee the sales or the remittance of the proceeds, cannot relieve himself from responsibiliy therefor without the consent of his principal.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Service Without Employment [2078. - 2079.26.]



  ARTICLE 1. Voluntary Interference with Property [2078. - 2078.]

2078.

One who officiously, and without the consent of the real or apparent owner of a thing, takes it into his possession for the purpose of rendering a service about it, must complete such service, and use ordinary care, diligence, and reasonable skill about the same. He is not entitled to any compensation for his service or expenses, except that he may deduct actual and necessary expenses incurred by him about such service from any profits which his service has caused the thing to acquire for its owner, and must account to the owner for the residue.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Duty to Prospective Purchaser of Real Property [2079. - 2079.25.]

2079.

(a) It is the duty of a real estate broker or salesperson, licensed under Division 4 (commencing with Section 10000) of the Business and Professions Code, to a prospective buyer of residential real property improved with one to four dwelling units or a manufactured home as defined in Section 18007 of the Health and Safety Code, to conduct a reasonably competent and diligent visual inspection of the property offered for sale and to disclose to that prospective buyer all facts materially affecting the value or desirability of the property that an investigation would reveal, if that broker has a written contract with the seller to
 find or obtain a buyer or is a broker who acts in cooperation with that broker to find and obtain a buyer.

(b) It is the duty of a real estate broker or salesperson, licensed under Division 4 (commencing with Section 10000) of the Business and Professions Code, to comply with this section and any regulations imposing standards of professional conduct adopted pursuant to Section 10080 of the Business and Professions Code with reference to Sections 10176 and 10177 of the Business and Professions Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 310, Sec. 8.   (AB 892)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

2079.1.

The provisions of this article relating sale transactions of residential real property comprising one to four dwelling units apply with equal force to leases of that property that include an option to purchase, ground leases of land on which one to four dwelling units have been constructed, or real property sales contracts, as defined in Section 2985, for that property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 223, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2079.2.

The standard of care owed by a broker under this article is the degree of care that a reasonably prudent real estate licensee would exercise and is measured by the degree of knowledge through education, experience, and examination, required to obtain a license under Division 4 (commencing with Section 10000) of the Business and Professions Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 223, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2079.3.

The inspection to be performed pursuant to this article does not include or involve an inspection of areas that are reasonably and normally inaccessible to this type of an inspection, nor an affirmative inspection of areas off the site of the subject property or public records or permits concerning the title or use of the property, and, if the property comprises a unit in a planned development as defined in Section
 11003 of the Business and Professions Code, a condominium as defined in Section 783, or a stock cooperative as defined in Section 11003.2 of the Business and Professions Code, does not include an inspection of more than the unit offered for sale, if the seller or the broker complies with the provisions of Sections 4525 to 4580, inclusive.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 181, Sec. 38.   (AB 806)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 86 of Ch. 181.)
-------------------------------------------

2079.4.

In no event shall the time for commencement of legal action for breach of duty imposed by this article exceed two years from the date of possession, which means the date of recordation, the date of close of escrow, or the date of occupancy, whichever occurs first.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 223, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2079.5.

Nothing in this article relieves a buyer or prospective buyer of the duty to exercise reasonable care to protect himself or herself, including those facts which are known to or within the diligent attention and observation of the buyer or prospective buyer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 223, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2079.6.

This article does not apply to sales which are required to be preceded by the furnishing, to a prospective buyer, of a copy of a public report pursuant to Section 11018.1 or Section 11234 of the Business and Professions Code and sales that can be made without a public report pursuant to Section 11010.4 of the Business and Professions Code, unless the property has been previously occupied.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 907, Sec. 31.   (AB 1289)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

2079.7.

(a) If a consumer information booklet described in Section 10084.1 of the Business and Professions Code is delivered to a buyer in connection with the sale of real property, including property specified in Section 1102 of the Civil Code, or manufactured housing, as defined in Section 18007 of the Health and Safety Code, a seller or broker is not required to provide additional information concerning, and the information shall be deemed to be adequate to inform the buyer regarding, common environmental hazards, as described in the booklet, that can affect real property.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), nothing in this section either increases or decreases the duties, if any, of sellers or brokers, including, but not limited to, the duties of a seller or broker
 under this article, Article 1.5 (commencing with Section 1102) of Chapter 2 of Title 4 of Part 4 of Division 2, or Section 78700 of the Health and Safety Code, or alters the duty of a seller or broker to disclose the existence of known environmental hazards on or affecting the real property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 258, Sec. 5.   (AB 2327)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2024, pursuant to Sec. 130 of Stats. 2022, Ch. 258.)
-------------------------------------------

2079.8.

(a) If a Homeowner’s Guide to Earthquake Safety described in Section 10149 of the Business and Professions Code is delivered to a buyer in connection with the sale of real property, including property specified in Section 1102 or under Chapter 7.5 (commencing with Section 2621) of Division 2 of the Public Resources Code, a seller or broker is not required to provide additional information concerning, and the
 information shall be deemed to be adequate to inform the buyer regarding, geologic and seismic hazards, in general, as described in the guide, that may affect real property and mitigating measures that the buyer or seller might consider.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), nothing in this section increases or decreases the duties, if any, of sellers or brokers, including, but not limited to, the duties of a seller or broker under this article, Article 1.5 (commencing with Section 1102) of Chapter 2 of Title 4 of Part 4 of Division 2, or under Chapter 7.5 (commencing with Section 2621) of Division 2 of the Public Resources Code, or alters the duty of a seller or broker to disclose the existence of known hazards on or affecting the real property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 907, Sec. 33.   (AB 1289)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

2079.9.

(a) If a Commercial Property Owner’s Guide to Earthquake Safety described in Section 10147 of the Business and Professions Code is delivered to a buyer in connection with the sale of real property, including property specified in Section 1102 or under Chapter 7.5 (commencing with Section 2621) of Division 2 of the Public Resources Code, a seller or broker is not required to provide additional information
 concerning, and the information shall be deemed to be adequate to inform the buyer regarding, geologic and seismic hazards, in general, as described in the guide, that may affect real property and mitigating measures that the buyer or seller might consider.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), nothing in this section increases or decreases the duties, if any, of sellers, their real estate brokers or agents under this article or under Chapter 7.5 (commencing with Section 2621) or Chapter 7.8 (commencing with Section 2690) of Division 2 of the Public Resources Code, or alters the duty of a seller, agent, or broker to disclose the existence of known hazards on or affecting the real property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 907, Sec. 34.   (AB 1289)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

2079.10.

(a) If the informational booklet published pursuant to Section 25402.9 of the Public Resources Code, concerning the statewide home energy rating program adopted pursuant to Section 25942 of the Public Resources Code, is delivered to a buyer in connection with the sale of real property, including, but not limited to, property specified in Section 1102, manufactured homes as defined in Section 18007 of the Health
 and Safety Code, and property subject to Chapter 7.5 (commencing with Section 2621) of Division 2 of the Public Resources Code, the seller or broker is not required to provide information additional to that contained in the booklet concerning home energy ratings, and the information in the booklet shall be deemed to be adequate to inform the buyer about the existence of a statewide home energy rating program.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), nothing in this section alters any existing duty of the seller or broker under any other law including, but not limited to, the duties of a seller or broker under this article, Article 1.5 (commencing with Section 1102) of Chapter 2 of Title 4 of Part 4 of Division 2 of the Civil Code, or Chapter 7.5 (commencing with Section 2621) of Division 2 of the Public Resources Code, to disclose information concerning the existence of a home energy rating program affecting the real property.

(c) If the informational booklet or materials described in Section 375.5 of the Water Code concerning water conservation and water conservation programs are delivered to a buyer in connection with the sale of real property, including property described in subdivision (a), the seller or broker is not required to provide information concerning water conservation and water conservation programs that is additional to that contained in the booklet or materials, and the information in the booklet or materials shall be deemed to be adequate to inform the buyer about water conservation and water conservation programs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 907, Sec. 35.   (AB 1289)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

2079.10.5.

(a) Every contract for the sale of single-family residential real property entered into on or after July 1, 2013, shall contain, in not less than 8-point type, a notice as specified below:
NOTICE REGARDING GAS AND HAZARDOUS LIQUID TRANSMISSION PIPELINES

This notice is
 being provided simply to inform you that information about the general location of gas and hazardous liquid transmission pipelines is available to the public via the National Pipeline Mapping System (NPMS) Internet Web site maintained by the United States Department of Transportation at http://www.npms.phmsa.dot.gov/. To seek further information about possible transmission pipelines near the property, you may contact your local gas utility or other pipeline operators in the area. Contact information for pipeline operators is searchable by ZIP Code and county on the NPMS Internet Web site.
(b) Upon delivery of the notice to the buyer of the real property, the seller or broker is not required to provide information in addition to that contained in the notice regarding gas and hazardous liquid transmission pipelines in subdivision (a). The information in the notice shall be deemed to be adequate to inform
 the buyer about the existence of a statewide database of the locations of gas and hazardous liquid transmission pipelines and information from the database regarding those locations.

(c) Nothing in this section shall alter any existing duty under any other statute or decisional law imposed upon the seller or broker, including, but not limited to, the duties of a seller or broker under this article, or the duties of a seller or broker under Article 1.5 (commencing with Section 1102) of Chapter 2 of Title 4 of Part 4 of Division 2.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 907, Sec. 36.   (AB 1289)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

2079.10a.

(a) Every lease or rental agreement for single-family residential real property entered into on or after July 1, 1999, any leasehold interest in real property consisting of multiunit residential property with more than four dwelling units entered into after that date, and every contract for the sale of residential real property comprised of one to four dwelling units entered into on or after that date, shall
 contain, in not less than 8-point type, a notice as specified in paragraph (1), (2), or (3).

(1) A contract entered into by the parties on or after July 1, 1999, and before September 1, 2005, shall contain the following notice:

Notice: The California Department of Justice, sheriff’s departments, police departments serving jurisdictions of 200,000 or more, and many other local law enforcement authorities maintain for public access a database of the locations of persons required to register pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 290.4 of the Penal Code. The database is updated on a quarterly basis and is a source of information about the presence of these individuals in any neighborhood. The Department of Justice also maintains a Sex Offender Identification Line through which inquiries about individuals may be made. This is a “900” telephone service. Callers shall have specific information about
 individuals they are checking. Information regarding neighborhoods is not available through the “900” telephone service.

(2) A contract entered into by the parties on or after September 1, 2005, and before April 1, 2006, shall contain either the notice specified in paragraph (1) or the notice specified in paragraph (3).

(3) A contract entered into by the parties on or after April 1, 2006, shall contain the following notice:

Notice: Pursuant to Section 290.46 of the Penal Code, information about specified registered sex offenders is made available to the public via an Internet Web site maintained by the Department of Justice at www.meganslaw.ca.gov. Depending on an offender’s criminal history, this information will include either the address at which the offender resides or the community of residence and ZIP Code in which the offender
 resides.

(b) Subject to subdivision (c), upon delivery of the notice to the lessee or buyer of the real property, the lessor, seller, or broker is not required to provide information in addition to that contained in the notice regarding the proximity of registered sex offenders. The information in the notice shall be deemed to be adequate to inform the lessee or buyer about the existence of a statewide database of the locations of registered sex offenders and information from the database regarding those locations. The information in the notice shall not give rise to any cause of action against the disclosing party by a registered sex offender.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) and (b), nothing in this section shall alter any existing duty of the lessor, seller, or broker under any other statute or decisional law including, but not limited to, the duties of a lessor, seller, or
 broker under this article, or the duties of a seller or broker under Article 1.5 (commencing with Section 1102) of Chapter 2 of Title 4 of Part 4 of Division 2.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 907, Sec. 37.   (AB 1289)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

2079.11.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), to the extent permitted by law, the consumer information publications referred to in this article, including, but not limited to, the information booklets described in Section 10084.1 of the Business and Professions Code and Section 25402.9 of the Public Resources Code, shall be in the public domain and freely available.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the Seismic Safety Commission’s Homeowner’s Guide to
 Earthquake Safety, published pursuant to Section 10149 of the Business and Professions Code, shall be made available to the public at cost and for reproduction at no cost to any vendor who wishes to publish the guide, provided the vendor agrees to submit the guide to the commission prior to publication for content approval.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 66) by Stats. 1998, Ch. 65, Sec. 4.   Effective June 9, 1998.   Applicable from June 1, 1998, by Sec. 18 of Ch. 65.   Note: Ch. 65 (pursuant to Sec. 20) supersedes and precludes operation of Stats. 1997, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

2079.12.

(a) The Legislature hereby finds and declares all of the following:

(1) That the imprecision of terms in the opinion rendered in Easton v. Strassburger, 152 Cal. App. 3d 90, and the absence of a comprehensive declaration of duties, standards, and exceptions, has caused insurers to modify professional liability coverage of real estate licensees and has caused confusion among real estate licensees as to the manner of performing the duty ascribed to them by the court.

(2) That it is necessary to resolve and make precise these issues in an expeditious manner.

(3) That it is desirable to facilitate the issuance of professional liability insurance as a resource for aggrieved members of the public.

(4) That Sections 2079 to 2079.6, inclusive, of this article should be construed as a definition of the duty of care found to exist by the holding of Easton v. Strassburger, 152 Cal. App. 3d 90, and the manner of its discharge, and is declarative of the common law regarding this duty. However, nothing in this section is intended to affect the court’s ability to interpret Sections 2079 to 2079.6, inclusive.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature to codify and make precise the holding of Easton v. Strassburger, 152 Cal. App. 3d
 90. It is not the intent of the Legislature to modify or restrict existing duties owed by real estate licensees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 476, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

2079.13.
